en: grenadier
fr: Hoki

en: Tub gurnard
fr: Grondin perlon

en: Blue shark
fr: Empereur

en: Blue shark fillet without skin
fr: Filet d'empereur sans peau

en: Smoked fishes, smoked fish
bg: Пушена риба
ca: Peix fumat
da: Røget fisk, røgede fisk
de: Räucherfisch
es: Pescado ahumado
fi: savustetut kalat
fr: Poissons fumés, poisson fumé
he: דגים מעושנים
hr: Dimljene ribe
hu: Füstölt halak
it: Pesci affumicati, pesce affumicato
nl: Gerookte vis
pl: Wędzone ryby, wędzona ryba
pt: Peixes fumados
ru: Копченая рыба
zh: 烟熏鱼类

en: Surmullet, red mullet
fr: Rouget-barbet de roche
hr: Barbun
la: Mullus surmuletus

en: Steamed surmullet, steamed red mullet
fr: Rouget-barbet de roche vapeur

en: Frozen Surmullet with skin, Frozen red mullet fillet with skin
fr: Filet de Rouget-barbet surgelé avec peau

en: Frozen Surmullet with skin from Senegal, Frozen red mullet fillet with skin from Senegal
fr: Rouget-barbet du Sénégal, Filet de Rouget-barbet surgelé avec peau from Sénégal

en: Frozen Surmullet with skin from Thailand, Frozen red mullet fillet with skin from Thailand
fr: Rouget-barbet de Thaïlande, Filet de Rouget-barbet surgelé avec peau de Thaïlande

en: Common sole
fr: Sole

en: Fried common sole
fr: Sole frite

en: Steammed common sole
fr: Sole cuite à la vapeur

en: Boiled common sole, Common sole cooked in water
fr: Sole cuite à l'eau

en: Grilled common sole, Common sole grilled
fr: Sole poêlée

en: Roasted common sole, Baked common sole
fr: Sole rôtie, Sole cuite au four

en: Frozen common sole
fr: Sole surgelée

en: Tonguesole
fr: sole tropicale, sole langue

en: Smoked salmons
bg: Пушена сьомга
ca: Salmó fumat
da: Røget laks
de: Räucherlachs, Geräucherter Lachs
es: Salmones ahumados, Salmón ahumado
fi: savustetut lohet
fr: Saumons fumés, saumon fumé
he: סלמון מעושן
hr: Dimljeni lososi
hu: Füstölt lazacok
it: Salmoni affumicati, salmone affumicato
ja: スモークサーモン
nl: Gerookte zalm
pl: Łosoś wędzony
pt: Salmões fumados
ro: Somon afumat
ru: Копченый лосось
zh: 烟熏三文鱼

en: Smoked salmons from farming
bg: Пушена сьомга от ферма
de: Räucherlachs aus Aquakultur
es: Salmones ahumados de granja
fi: savustetut viljellyt lohet
fr: Saumons fumés d'élevage, saumon fumé d'élevage, saumons d'élevage fumés, saumons d'élevages fumés
hr: Dimljeni losos iz uzgoja
it: Salmoni affumicati d'allevamenti
nl: Gerookte kweekzalm